Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-727
Articles of incorporation; amendment; procedure.

A corporation may amend its articles of incorporation by a majority vote of the members present in person at any regular meeting, or at any special meeting of its members called for that purpose. The power to amend shall include the power to accomplish any desired change in the provisions of its articles of incorporation, and to include any purpose, power or provision which would be authorized to be included in original articles of incorporation if executed at the time the amendment is made. Articles of amendment signed by the president or vice president, and attested by the secretary, certifying to such amendment and its lawful adoption, shall be executed, acknowledged, filed and recorded in the same manner as the original articles of incorporation of a corporation organized under sections 70-701 to 70-738. As soon as the Secretary of State shall have accepted the articles of amendment for filing and recording, and issued a certificate of amendment, the amendment or amendments shall be in effect.

Laws 1937, c. 50, § 26, p. 210;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-826;

R.S.1943, § 70-727.